Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.140

Unqualified registration.

A person who knows that he or she does not possess the legal qualifications of a voter and who registers to vote is guilty of a class C felony. This section does not apply to persons age sixteen or seventeen signing up to register to vote as authorized under RCW 29A.08.170 or 29A.08.355(2).

[ 2020 c 208 s 20; 2018 c 109 s 13; 2005 c 246 s 22; 2003 c 111 s 2108. Prior: 2001 c 41 s 13. Formerly RCW 29.85.249.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 208 ss 7, 8, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 29A.08.355.

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.